Wyoming, session 2025, HB0211.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 23-3-306(a) is amended to read:
23-3-306. Use of aircraft, automobiles, motorized and
snow vehicles and artificial light for hunting or fishing
prohibited; exceptions; penalties.
(a) No person shall harass, pursue, hunt, shoot, or
kill any Wyoming wildlife except predatory animals that
requires a license or permit to take, is protected under
W.S. 23-1-101(a)(ix) and (x) or is classified as threatened
or endangered by federal wildlife regulations, with, from,
or by use of any aircraft, automotive vehicle, trailer,
motor-propelled wheeled vehicle, or vehicle designed for
travel over snow. No person shall use any aircraft, to aid
in the taking of any Wyoming wildlife, except predatory
animals, whether by spotting or locating the wildlife,
communicating with any person attempting to take the
wildlife, or by providing other aid to any person taking
the wildlife. Nothing in this subsection shall apply to the
use of any aircraft by governmental agencies, their
employees, contractors or designees performing any lawful
duties. The commission may exempt handicapped hunters from
any provision of this subsection. For purposes of this
section, "aircraft" means any machine or device capable of
atmospheric flight including but not limited to an
airplane, helicopter, glider, dirigible or unmanned aerial
vehicle.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0211
ENROLLED ACT NO. 36, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2